Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.080

Additional contributions may be required.

In addition to the basic and supplemental employer contributions required by RCW 41.45.060, * 41.45.053, and 41.45.070, the department may also require additional employer contributions as provided by law.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 11 s 17; 1989 c 273 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 41.45.053 was repealed by 2002 c 7 s 2.

Effective date—2001 2nd sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 41.45.030.